Hawaii statutes.
[§98-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Electronic" means relating to
technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical,
electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

"Legal material" means, whether or
not in effect:

(1) The Constitution of the State of Hawaii;

(2) The Session Laws of Hawaii;

(3) The Hawaii Revised Statutes;

(4) A state agency rule that has or had the effect of
law;

(5) Reported decisions of the following state
courts: the supreme court of the State of Hawaii and the intermediate
appellate court of the State of Hawaii; or

(6) State court rules.

"Official publisher" means:

(1) For the Constitution of the State of Hawaii, the
revisor of statutes;

(2) For the Session Laws of Hawaii, the revisor of
statutes;

(3) For the Hawaii Revised Statutes, the revisor of
statutes;

(4) For any administrative agency rules, the office
of the governor;

(5) For a state court decision included under
paragraph (5) of the definition of "legal material", the supreme
court; or

(6) For state court rules, the supreme court.

"Publish" means to display, present,
or release to the public, or cause to be displayed, presented, or released to
the public, by the official publisher.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"State" means a state of the United
States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of
the United States. [L 2013, c 11, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next